Tennessee, session 114, SB1746.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-113, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
(e) Private citizens and organizations are not bound by the Fourteenth
Amendment or by the Supreme Court's purported interpretation of the Fourteenth
Amendment in Obergefell v. Hodges, 576 U.S. 644 (2015), and no private citizen or
organization in this state is required to recognize a marriage or a purported marriage
between individuals of the same sex, notwithstanding any other law.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 17-5-301, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
(k) Notwithstanding any other law, the board shall not discipline, sanction, or
threaten to discipline or sanction any person for declining to celebrate or officiate at a
marriage or commitment ceremony that falls outside the definition of marriage provided
in this code.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to actions occurring on or after that date.
SB1746
010631
- 1 -